Utah statutes.
13-43-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Constitutional taking" or "taking" means a governmental action resulting
in a taking of real property that requires compensation to the owner of the
property under:
(a)  the Fifth or Fourteenth Amendment of the Constitution of the United
States; or
(b)  Utah Constitution Article I, Section 22.
(2)  "Takings and eminent domain law" means the provisions of the federal and
state constitutions, the case law interpreting those provisions, and any
relevant statutory provisions that:
(a)  involve constitutional issues arising from the use or ownership of real
property;
(b)  require a governmental unit to compensate a real property owner for a
constitutional taking; or
(c)  provide for relocation assistance to those persons who are displaced by
the use of eminent domain.
